tests/ky-pronouns.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../tr-ky.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../ky-tr.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[lexc] Personal pronouns":
    мен<prn><pers><p1><sg><nom>  : мен 
    сен<prn><pers><p2><sg><nom>  : сен 
    сиз<prn><pers><p2><frm><sg><nom>  : сиз 
    ал<prn><pers><p3><sg><nom>  : ал 
    биз<prn><pers><p1><pl><nom>  : биз 
    силер<prn><pers><p2><pl><nom>  : силер 
    сиздер<prn><pers><p2><frm><pl><nom>  : сиздер 
    алар<prn><pers><p3><pl><nom> : алар 
    мен<prn><pers><p1><sg><acc>  : мени 
    сен<prn><pers><p2><sg><acc>  : сени 
    сиз<prn><pers><p2><frm><sg><gen>  : сизди 
    ал<prn><pers><p3><sg><gen>  : аны 
    биз<prn><pers><p1><pl><gen>  : бизди 
    силер<prn><pers><p2><pl><gen>  : силерди 
    сиздер<prn><pers><p2><frm><pl><gen>  : сиздерди 
    алар<prn><pers><p3><pl><gen> : аларды 
    мен<prn><pers><p1><sg><gen>  : менин 
    сен<prn><pers><p2><sg><gen>  : сенин 
    сиз<prn><pers><p2><frm><sg><acc>  : сиздин 
    ал<prn><pers><p3><sg><acc>  : анын 
    биз<prn><pers><p1><pl><acc>  : биздин 
    силер<prn><pers><p2><pl><acc>  : силердин 
    сиздер<prn><pers><p2><frm><pl><acc>  : сиздердин 
    алар<prn><pers><p3><pl><acc> : алардын 
    мен<prn><pers><p1><sg><dat>  : мага 
    сен<prn><pers><p2><sg><dat>  : сага 
    сиз<prn><pers><p2><frm><sg><dat>  : сизге 
    ал<prn><pers><p3><sg><dat>  : ага 
    биз<prn><pers><p1><pl><dat>  : бизге 
    силер<prn><pers><p2><pl><dat>  : силерге 
    сиздер<prn><pers><p2><frm><pl><dat>  : сиздерге 
    алар<prn><pers><p3><pl><dat> : аларга 
    мен<prn><pers><p1><sg><loc>  : менде 
    сен<prn><pers><p2><sg><loc>  : сенде 
    сиз<prn><pers><p2><frm><sg><loc>  : сизде 
    ал<prn><pers><p3><sg><loc>  : анда 
    биз<prn><pers><p1><pl><loc>  : бизде 
    силер<prn><pers><p2><pl><loc>  : силерде 
    сиздер<prn><pers><p2><frm><pl><loc>  : сиздерде 
    алар<prn><pers><p3><pl><loc> : аларда 
    мен<prn><pers><p1><sg><abl>  : менден 
    сен<prn><pers><p2><sg><abl>  : сенден 
    сиз<prn><pers><p2><sg><frm><abl>  : сизден 
    ал<prn><pers><p3><sg><abl>  : андан 
    биз<prn><pers><p1><pl><abl>  : бизден 
    силер<prn><pers><p2><pl><abl>  : силерден 
    сиздер<prn><pers><p2><frm><pl><abl>  : сиздерден 
    алар<prn><pers><p3><pl><abl> : алардан 

  "[lexc] Demonstrative pronoun 'бул'": 
    бул<prn><dem><sg><nom> : бул
    бул<prn><dem><sg><gen> : мунун
    бул<prn><dem><sg><dat> : буга
    бул<prn><dem><sg><acc> : муну
    бул<prn><dem><sg><loc> : мында
    бул<prn><dem><sg><abl> : мындан
    бул<prn><dem><pl><nom> : булар
    бул<prn><dem><pl><gen> : булардын
    бул<prn><dem><pl><dat> : буларга
    бул<prn><dem><pl><acc> : буларды
    бул<prn><dem><pl><loc> : буларда
    бул<prn><dem><pl><abl> : булардан

  "[lexc] Demonstrative pronoun 'ал'":
    ал<prn><dem><sg><nom> : ал
    ал<prn><dem><sg><gen> : анын
    ал<prn><dem><sg><dat> : ага
    ал<prn><dem><sg><acc> : аны
    ал<prn><dem><sg><loc> : анда
    ал<prn><dem><sg><abl> : андан
    ал<prn><dem><pl><nom> : алар
    ал<prn><dem><pl><gen> : алардын
    ал<prn><dem><pl><dat> : аларга
    ал<prn><dem><pl><acc> : аларды
    ал<prn><dem><pl><loc> : аларда
    ал<prn><dem><pl><abl> : алардан

  "[lexc] Demonstrative pronoun 'ошол'":
    ошол<prn><dem><sg><nom> : ошол
    ошол<prn><dem><sg><gen> : ошонун
    ошол<prn><dem><sg><dat> : ошого
    ошол<prn><dem><sg><acc> : ошону
    ошол<prn><dem><sg><loc> : ошондо
    ошол<prn><dem><sg><abl> : ошондон
    ошол<prn><dem><pl><nom> : ошолор
    ошол<prn><dem><pl><gen> : ошолордун
    ошол<prn><dem><pl><dat> : ошолорго
    ошол<prn><dem><pl><acc> : ошолорду
    ошол<prn><dem><pl><loc> : ошолордо
    ошол<prn><dem><pl><abl> : ошолордон

  "[lexc] Demonstrative pronoun 'тигил'":
    тигил<prn><dem><sg><nom> : тигил
    тигил<prn><dem><sg><gen> : тигинин
    тигил<prn><dem><sg><dat> : тигиге
    тигил<prn><dem><sg><acc> : тигини
    тигил<prn><dem><sg><loc> : тигинде
    тигил<prn><dem><sg><abl> : тигинден
    тигил<prn><dem><pl><nom> : тигилер
    тигил<prn><dem><pl><gen> : тигилердин
    тигил<prn><dem><pl><dat> : тигилерге
    тигил<prn><dem><pl><acc> : тигилерди
    тигил<prn><dem><pl><loc> : тигилерде
    тигил<prn><dem><pl><abl> : тигилерден
